Washington statutes.
RCW 19.260.010

Findings.

The legislature finds that appliance standards and design requirements:

(1) For certain products sold or installed in the state assure consumers and businesses that such products meet minimum efficiency performance levels thus saving money on utility bills.

(2) Save energy and reduce pollution and other environmental impacts associated with the production, distribution, and use of electricity and natural gas.

(3) Contribute to the economy of Washington by helping to better balance energy supply and demand, thus reducing pressure for higher natural gas and electricity prices. By saving consumers and businesses money on energy bills, efficiency standards help the state and local economy, since energy bill savings can be spent on local goods and services.

(4) Can make electricity systems more reliable by reducing the strain on the electricity grid during peak demand periods. Furthermore, improved energy efficiency can reduce or delay the need for new power plants, power transmission lines, and power distribution system upgrades.

(5) Help ensure renters have the same access to energy efficient appliances as homeowners.

[ 2019 c 286 s 1; 2005 c 298 s 1.]

NOTES: